Tennessee, session 114, HB2395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1028, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e)
(1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, and in conjunction with
the social studies curriculum, each LEA and public charter school shall present a
civics instructional video approved by the state board of education at least once
to students in grades six through eight (6-8) and at least once to students in
grades nine through twelve (9-12).
(2) The state board shall approve at least one (1) civics instructional
video for purposes of subdivision (e)(1) no later than July 1, 2027. The state
board shall not create or request an individual or entity to create a video for
purposes of this subdivision (e)(2). A civics instructional video approved
pursuant to this subdivision (e)(2) must:
(A) Be historically accurate and devoid of political advocacy; and
(B) Include information about:
(i) The Declaration of Independence, specifically the
preamble to the Declaration of Independence, and the meaning
behind and purpose of the quote, "We hold these truths to be self-
evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by
HB2395
011494
- 1 -

their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are
Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness"; and
(ii) The religious affiliation and moral beliefs of the
founding fathers involved with the Articles of Confederation and
the Constitutional Convention.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011494